District of Columbia statutes.
29-935

Existing cooperative groups; acceptance of act; filing and recordation of amended articles and bylaws.

Any group incorporated under another law of the District and operating on a cooperative basis or any unincorporated group operating on such a basis in the District may elect by a vote of 2 /3 of the members voting to secure the benefits of and be bound by this chapter, and shall thereupon amend the parts of its articles and bylaws as are not in conformity with this chapter. A certified copy of the amended articles shall be delivered to the Mayor for filing.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(14), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-902.
2001 Ed., § 29-940.
1981 Ed., § 29-1140.
1973 Ed., § 29-840.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “delivered to the Mayor for filing” for “filed with the Mayor.”
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.